California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(d) In addition to pledging revenues for the payment of any revenue bonds, the district may pledge for the payment of the bonds all other income or receipts of the district which are not required by law to be used for other purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1147, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Bonds and Other Evidences of Indebtedness [29150. - 29293.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization of General Obligation Bonds [29150. - 29168.]

29150.

The district may borrow money, incur a bonded indebtedness in respect thereto, and levy taxes for the payment of principal and interest thereon, in the manner provided in Chapter 7 of this part, but no such bonded debt shall exceed fifteen (15) percent of the assessed valuation of taxable property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29151.

Before submitting a proposal to incur any bonded indebtedness, the district shall employ such engineers, economists, fiscal experts and others as is necessary to develop general plans, estimates and general specifications pertaining to the projects for which the bond issue is proposed, sufficient in the opinion of the board to enable the board to determine the feasibility of such projects, provided that no such reports or the approval thereof specified in Section 29156 of this code shall be applicable to any proposal for the issuance of additional bonds to complete the project referred to in the original reports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1518.)
-------------------------------------------

29152.

Such engineers, economists, fiscal experts and others shall make reports to the district, which shall include:

(a) A general description of the facilities to be acquired or constructed from the proceeds of the proposed bond issue.

(b) The estimated total cost of constructing or acquiring, or both, such facilities.

(c) The estimated period of construction of such facilities.

(d) An estimate of the revenues which may
 be expected to be derived therefrom. 

(e) The amount of bonds which will be required to pay the estimated total cost of constructing or acquiring such facilities. If the district determines to make interest payments out of bond proceeds, the estimate may include a sum sufficient to pay interest on the bonds during the estimated period of construction and for three years, or less, thereafter.

(f) An estimate of the taxes required to be levied for all district purposes, the sources from which such taxes shall be obtained, and the proportion or amount to be derived from each source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29153.

After receiving such reports, the board shall determine and declare by resolution whether or not the proposed plan of work is feasible and whether or not the project, as set forth in said reports, is necessary, and if so, shall make an order determining the amount of bonds that should be issued in order to raise the amount of money necessary therefor, and in determining such amount, sufficient shall be included to cover the cost of inspection of works in course of construction. Such determination by the board shall constitute a conclusive determination that the reports then on file with the board are adequate and sufficient to enable the board to make the determination as
 set forth in such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29154.

After adoption by the board of the reports made pursuant to Section 29152 the board shall refer such reports to the boards of supervisors of the counties comprising the district for their approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29155.

After receiving the reports, each board of supervisors shall fix a time and place for a public hearing to consider the reports. The time fixed for the hearing shall not be less than 30 days nor more than 60 days from the date the reports were received from the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 177.)
-------------------------------------------

29156.

Within 15 days from the date of the public hearing held pursuant to Section 29155, each board of supervisors shall, by a resolution adopted by a majority vote of the board of supervisors, determine whether it approves the reports and shall file an executed copy of the resolution with the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

29157.

If a majority of any board of supervisors does not approve the reports, the district may make additional studies and changes and may refer the amended reports to the board of supervisors of the counties comprising the district in order to obtain unanimous approval from the counties comprising the district. If no agreement is reached within a period of six months following the date the original reports were received from the board, any county not approving the reports may withdraw from the district under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 29650), notwithstanding that, after that county’s disapproval, the reports are withdrawn by the district.
 Failure of a county to withdraw from the district, within 30 days following the six-month period, has the same effect as approval by the board of supervisors of the county of the reports as last amended, unless the reports have been previously withdrawn by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

29157.1.

Whenever it appears to the board that bonded indebtedness heretofore authorized pursuant to the provisions of this article is insufficient to cover all costs of the acquisition and construction of facilities, the board shall make an order determining the amount of bonds that should be issued in order to raise the additional funds necessary for the completion of such facilities. The provisions of Sections 29154, 29155, 29156 and 29157 of this code shall not be applicable to any election to authorize the issuance of additional bonds, after the district shall have issued all or any part of its first authorized issue of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1518.)
-------------------------------------------

29158.

When the district has received unanimous approval from the boards of supervisors of the counties comprising the district pursuant to Section 29156 of this code, or when the board has made its order pursuant to Section 29157.1 of this code, the board shall call a special election and submit to the qualified voters of the district the proposition of incurring such bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction or completion of rapid transit facilities by the district and all other works, property, or structures necessary or convenient therefor and for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1518.)
-------------------------------------------

29159.

The resolution calling the special election shall contain:

(a) A statement of the general object and purpose of incurring the indebtedness.

(b) Statement of the estimated cost of the proposed work and improvements.

(c) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor. 

(d) The maximum term, which shall not exceed fifty (50) years, that the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before
 maturity.

(e) The maximum rate of interest to be paid on said indebtedness, which shall not exceed six (6) percent per annum.

(f) A statement declaring whether interest, to be paid upon such bonds during the estimated period of construction of the works of the district and for three years thereafter, or less, shall be a capital charge, and shall be payable out of the principal sum realized from the sale of bonds, and, if so, to what extent. 

(g) An estimate of the taxes required to be levied for all district purposes, the sources from which such taxes shall be obtained, and the proportion or amount to be derived from each source.

(h) The date on which the special bond election will be held, the hours during the day which the polls will be open, and the
 manner of voting for and against the incurring of such indebtedness; provided, however, the district shall have no power or authority, within six (6) months after an election at which a proposition submitted to the qualified electors of the district failed to receive the requisite number of votes as provided in Section 29168, to call or order another election for incurring any indebtedness for purposes substantially the same as voted upon at such prior election. If the special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the hours during which the polls shall be kept open in each county shall be the same as those provided for the election with which the election called pursuant to this part is consolidated and reference to that effect in the resolution shall be sufficient without specifying the particular hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29160.

The provisions of Section 37.5 of Chapter 1239 of the Statutes of 1949, the San Francisco Bay Area Metropolitan Rapid Transit District Act, relating to the repayment of appropriations made to the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit Commission from the proceeds of the first sale of bonds issued by the district created by that act, shall apply to and be binding upon the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29161.

Any election submitting the proposition of incurring indebtedness and the issuance of bonds called pursuant to this part, may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law, at which the qualified voters of any county, city and county, or city are entitled to vote. However, in the event an election called pursuant to this part is consolidated with any other election, as provided by Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code, the provisions of this part setting forth the procedure for the
 calling of the election called pursuant to this part shall be complied with, except that the resolution calling the election need not set forth the election precincts or polling places, or the officers of election, which shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, order, resolution, notice, or other proceeding calling or providing for, or listing or designating the precincts, polling places, and election officers for the election with which the election called pursuant to this part is consolidated, and shall refer to the election or to the ordinance, order, resolution, notice, or other proceeding calling, providing for, or giving notice of the election, and which sets forth the precincts, polling places, and election officers. This reference may be made by giving the number or title or date of adoption of the ordinance, resolution, or order or to the date or proposed date of any publication of the notice and the name of the newspaper or proposed newspaper in which the notice has been or will be
 published or by any other definite description. Whenever a bond election called pursuant to this part is consolidated with a statewide general election held in the district, references to that general election shall be sufficient for all purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 195.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

29162.

Whenever a special bond election is called pursuant to this part and is not consolidated with any other election the board shall in its resolution calling such special bond election, in addition to all other matters required to be set forth therein:

(a) Specify the precincts or consolidated precincts in each county or portion of a county which are adopted for the purposes of the election and designate the location of the polling places, provided that one or more polling places may be established within the same precinct and separate ballot boxes and separate officers of election provided for each group of
 electors, which group shall be determined by alphabetical designations and divided into groups as nearly equal in number as practicable.

(b) Specify the names of the officers selected to conduct the election, who shall consist of at least one inspector and two judges in each precinct, but not in excess of six election officers for each polling place.

Whenever the special bond election called pursuant to this part is consolidated in whole or in part with any other election, the precincts, polling places and election officers need not be set forth in the resolution calling the special bond election except only to the extent that any precinct, polling place and election officers established for the special bond election differ or are in addition to those established for the election with which the special bond election called pursuant to this part is consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29163.

Notice of a special bond election shall be given by publication of the text of the resolution calling the election and except as provided below the text thereof shall be published once a week in each calendar week for two successive calendar weeks at any time prior to the election (the first publication of which shall be not less than twenty (20) days nor more than ninety (90) days prior to the date fixed for the election) in at least one newspaper of general circulation and in not more than three newspapers, designated by the board, which are printed and published in each county within the district. That portion of the resolution constituting notice of election as
 published in each county shall contain only the reference to the precincts, polling places, and election officers in the county or portion of the county in which it is published, and it shall not be necessary to publish any portion of the resolution setting forth the precincts, polling places or election officers in any other county. Except for the omission in any county of the reference to the precinct, polling place and election officers in any other county, the text of the resolution as published in each county to constitute notice of said election shall be the resolution in form as adopted by the board. To each resolution published in each county there shall be set forth a notice substantially as follows:
”Notice of Election
Notice is hereby given to the qualified electors of the San Francisco Bay
 Area Rapid Transit District that the Board of Directors has duly adopted a resolution calling a special bond election within the District which is set forth in full below, except only for the omission of the designation of the precinct, polling place and officers of election in any county or portion of a county in which such election is to be held except only the designation of such election details as the same pertain to the county or portion of a county in which the attached resolution is published, which election details are set forth in the following text of the resolution.”
If there is no newspaper published in any county within the district, the notice shall be posted in three public places in such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29164.

All the expenses of holding the election shall be borne by the district, except when the election is consolidated with another election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code, in which case the expense borne by the district shall be that agreed upon by the district and the other governing body or bodies calling the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 196.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

29165.

No error, irregularity or omission in the calling, holding or conducting of any special bond election which does not affect the substantial rights of the taxpayers within the district or the electors voting at any election at which bonds of the district are authorized to be issued shall invalidate the election or any bonds authorized thereat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29166.

(a) The returns of the election shall be made and the votes shall be canvassed by the county elections official in each county contained in the district, within thirty (30) days after holding of the election, and the county elections officials, respectively, shall certify the result of the election in each county, respectively, to the board of the district.

(b) In the event that the election is consolidated with any other election, the returns of the election, the method
 of canvassing, and the results thereof shall be designated and declared in accordance with Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 197.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

29167.

At any special bond election called pursuant to this part, all residents of the district who are qualified electors possessing the qualifications prescribed by the general election laws of the State of California shall be entitled to vote thereat. All special bond elections shall be held and conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general laws of the State of California, including provisions with respect to voting by absent voters, but the requirements as to the form of ballots need not apply except to the extent adopted by the board. Whether a resident of the district is a qualified elector within the district shall be conclusively determined by the
 last great register of voters of the county or portion of the county in which the election is held. Except when the special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the board shall designate the hours during which the polls shall be kept open. The polls shall not be opened before 7 a.m. nor kept open later than 8 p.m. and shall be kept open for not less than four hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29168.

At any special bond election two or more propositions for incurring indebtedness may be submitted at the same election in which event the votes cast for and against each proposition shall be counted separately, and whenever three-fifths of the qualified electors voting on any one of such propositions vote in favor thereof such proposition shall be deemed adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1622.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Terms of General Obligation Bonds [29169. - 29184.]

29169.

Whenever three-fifths of the votes cast at any special bond election or on any proposition submitted thereat are in favor of incurring the indebtedness set forth in such proposition, the board may by resolution at any time it deems proper, or from time to time, provide for the authorization and issuance of the bonds not exceeding the amount authorized at such election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1622.)
-------------------------------------------

29170.

Bonds may be issued in form payable to bearer, with coupons attached for payment of interest and, if so issued, may be made subject to registration. Bonds issued in bearer form shall constitute negotiable instruments for all purposes under the laws of the State of California. The district may appoint a registration agent which may be a bank or trust company and authorize such registration agent to maintain books of registry and to register, authenticate and exchange bonds on such terms and conditions and pursuant to such rules and regulations as the district may provide. The district may provide for the interchange of coupon bonds for registered bonds and registered bonds
 for coupon bonds, and may provide that the bonds shall be registered as to principal only, or as to both principal and interest, or otherwise, as the district may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29171.

Coupon bonds may be issued in denominations of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or multiples thereof, as the district may determine. Coupon bonds of different denominations shall be exchangeable for coupon bonds of other denominations or for registered bonds on terms and conditions as the district may determine, including provisions for the authentication of any bonds issued upon the exchange by the registration agent or other agents appointed by the district for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 392.)
-------------------------------------------

29172.

Registered bonds may be issued without limitation as to principal amount, as may be determined by the district, except that registered bonds shall be in denominations of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or multiples thereof. Registered bonds of any denomination shall be exchangeable with bonds, either in registered or coupon form, of other denominations on such terms and conditions as the district shall determine, including provisions for authentication of bonds issued upon such exchange by the registration agent or other agents appointed by the district for that purpose, and upon the payment of such reasonable charges as may be prescribed by the
 district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29173.

Bonds shall bear interest at a rate of not to exceed 8 percent per annum, payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year or any fraction thereof may be paid in one installment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

29174.

The district may provide for redemption of bonds prior to maturity, on such notice and at such time or times and with such redemption provisions, including premiums, as the district may determine, provided that no redemption premium shall be in excess of 6 percent of the principal amount of the bonds to be redeemed. No bond is subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date, unless the right to exercise such call and the redemption price are expressly stated on the face of the bond. When bonds have been validly called for redemption and payment of the principal thereof, and the interest thereon accrued to the date of redemption, together with the redemption
 premium, if any, shall have been made or provided for, interest thereon shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29175.

The district may provide for the payment of the principal and interest of bonds at any place within the State of California, or at any other place within the United States, which the district may designate. The place of payment shall be specified in the bonds and payment shall be made in any coin or currency of the United States of America which at the time of payment is legal tender for public and private debts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29176.

Bonds shall bear dates prescribed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29177.

Bonds may be serial or sinking fund bonds, or in part serially and in part sinking fund bonds, with such maturities and in such amounts annually, semiannually or otherwise, as the district may determine at the time of authorizing the issuance thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29178.

No bond by its terms shall mature in more than fifty (50) years from its own date, and in the event any authorized issue is divided into two or more series or divisions, the maximum maturity herein authorized shall be calculated from the date on the face of each bond, separately, irrespective of the fact that different dates may be prescribed for the bonds of each separate series or division of any authorized issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29179.

The district may divide any authorized issue into one or more series or division and fix different dates and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series or division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29180.

The district may prescribe the form of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and of the interest coupons attached to those bonds. Bonds shall be signed by the president of the board, or by another
 member of the board
 designated by the board by resolution for that purpose, and countersigned by the secretary of the district and the seal of the district shall be affixed to those bonds. The interest coupons on the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the chief financial officer of
 the district. The signature on all coupons and one signature on the bonds may be engraved, lithographed, or printed facsimile signature. The seal of the district may be affixed to any bond by mechanical reproduction of a facsimile of the seal. In case any officer whose signature or countersignature appearing on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer of the district before the delivery of
 the bonds to the purchaser, that signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if that officer had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds. If the district appoints a registration agent, fiscal agent, or other agent to authenticate bonds, any bond of the district, whether in coupon or registered form, may be signed by the facsimile signatures of the officers of the district with a facsimile seal of the district affixed mechanically or otherwise reproduced
 on the bonds, provided that the bonds shall be authenticated by the fiscal agent, registration agent, or other agent appointed by the district for that purpose. Any agent appointed by the district to authenticate registered bonds or exchange bonds of different denominations, or coupon bonds for registered bonds, or vice versa, shall be a bank or trust company authorized to transact, and transacting, business in the State of California or the State of New York.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 6.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29181.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, the district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board, to be exchanged for definitive bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29182.

The district may provide that interest on bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds during the actual construction of any project, for the acquisition, construction, or completion of which bonds have been issued, and for a period of not to exceed three years thereafter, as determined by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29183.

The district shall provide for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds by the levy and collection of taxes upon all property in the district subject to taxation by the district without limitation of rate or amount as provided in Sections 29121 and 29122 of this part, except that such taxes need not be levied to the extent that the district deposits in the treasury set apart for that purpose moneys derived from surplus revenues or any appropriations which may be made to it for that purpose or from any other funds howsoever derived.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29184.

Any general obligation bonds which shall be issued under the provisions of this part shall be legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, banks—both commercial and savings—and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or irrigation districts within the State of California, such money or funds may be invested in the general obligation bonds issued under this part, and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or irrigation districts within this State
 may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public moneys, the said bonds issued under this part may be so used. The provisions of this part shall be in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issuance and Sale of General Obligation Bonds [29200. - 29202.]

29200.

The district may by resolution at any time, or from time to time, provide for the authorization and issuance of any bonds authorized pursuant to this part and for the sale of the whole or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29201.

Before making a sale of any of the bonds, notice shall be given by publication once a week, for two weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, if there is one, and no sale shall be held prior to the expiration of 15 days from the first publication of the notice. Copies of such advertisement may be published in any newspaper or financial publication in the United States and copies may be mailed to recognized investment dealers, banks, investing institutions and statistical organizations, together with any related material pertaining to the district and its bonds, but no defect in any such additional publication or failure to mail or failure of any
 person to receive copies of any such materials so mailed shall affect the validity of the sale. The board may reject any or all bids received if it determines that the bids are not satisfactory as to price or as to the responsibility of the bidders. If no bids are received or if the board rejects all bids received, the board may either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale, provided, however, that if the bonds are sold at private sale, they shall not be sold at a price lower than the highest bid, if any, which was received at the public sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1518.)
-------------------------------------------

29202.

The published notice of sale shall describe the bonds and set forth the terms and conditions of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding Bonds [29210. - 29225.]

29210.

The district may provide for the funding or refunding of outstanding general obligation indebtedness pursuant to this article, if any of the following conditions exist:

(a) The district has indebtedness evidenced by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, which according to their terms are subject to call or payment before maturity.

(b) The district has filed a petition under any bankruptcy law of the United States and refunding of its indebtedness is authorized in the bankruptcy proceedings.

(c) The holder or holders of outstanding indebtedness has consented to exchange such outstanding bonds for refunding bonds bearing a lower rate of interest than such outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29211.

The district by a two-thirds vote of the board may fund or refund its general obligation indebtedness at, after, or before maturity and issue refunding bonds of the district to refund the indebtedness evidenced by such outstanding securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29212.

Refunding general obligations may be issued and may be sold in accordance with Articles 2 (commencing with Section 29169) and 3 (commencing with Section 29200), except that no election need be called or held for the purpose of authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds and the refunding bonds may be sold and the proceeds thereof applied to the redemption of bonds of indebtedness or may be exchanged at not less than their par value for the evidences of indebtedness to be refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

29213.

Refunding bonds issued pursuant to this article will have the same weight and force and may be used in the same manner as the bonds to be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29214.

The proceeds of any sale of refunding bonds for cash shall be deposited with the chief financial officer or depositary, as determined by the district, to the credit of the Funding Fund, and applied only to refunding the indebtedness for which the bonds are issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 7.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29215.

Any proceeds of the refunding bonds remaining after the indebtedness has been paid shall be deposited in the fund established for the payment of principal and interest on the refunding bonds and used only for the purpose of paying such principal or interest as it matures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29216.

At the time of making the general tax levy after incurring the bonded indebtedness and annually thereafter until the refunding bonds are paid or until there is a sum in the treasury set apart for that purpose sufficient to meet all payments of principal and interest on the bonds as they become due, the district shall levy and collect a tax sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds and such part of the principal as will become due before the proceeds of the next general tax levy will be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29217.

If the earliest maturity of the refunding bonds is more than one year after the date of issuance, the board shall levy and collect annually a tax sufficient to pay the interest as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29218.

The taxes shall be levied and collected as other district taxes, and are in addition to all other taxes. They shall be used only for the payment of the bonds and interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29219.

Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for (a) the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness to be refunded; (b) all expenses incidental to the calling, retirement or payment of the outstanding bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness and the issuance of refunding bonds including the difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and any amount less than par; (c) any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of their delivery
 to the date of maturity or payment of the bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness to be refunded out of the proceeds of sale or the date upon which the bonds, notes or evidences of indebtedness to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call and redemption thereof or pursuant to any agreement with the holders thereof for the refunding or exchanging of such bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness; and (d) the premium if any necessary to be paid in order to call and retire the outstanding bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness to be refunded. Refunding bonds may be exchanged at not less than their par value and accrued interest for outstanding bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness to be refunded thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29220.

When sufficient money is in the Funding Fund to redeem one or more outstanding past due bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, or to redeem one or more of the outstanding bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, that
 are subject to call or payment before maturity, and that are proposed to be funded or refunded, the chief financial officer shall publish a notice that the chief financial officer is prepared to pay the bond, note,
 or other evidence of indebtedness
 and give its number, if any, in that notice. The notice shall be published once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, if there is one. Copies of that advertisement may be published in any newspaper or financial publication in the United States. If the bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness to be called for redemption or refunded is not presented for redemption on or before the date specified for redemption, as set forth on the face of
 the outstanding bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, interest upon it shall cease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 8.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29221.

At the same time, the chief financial officer shall deposit in the post office a copy of the notice, enclosed in a sealed envelope, postage prepaid, addressed to the registered owner of any such bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, registered pursuant to this part, whose address appears upon the record in the chief financial officer’s office. If the bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness is
 not presented within the time specified in the notice, the interest upon it ceases and the amount due shall be set aside for the payment when presented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 9.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29222.

When any outstanding bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness are surrendered and paid, the chief financial officer shall cancel them by endorsing on their faces the amount for which they are received,
 “Canceled,” and the date of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 10.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29223.

The chief financial officer shall keep a record of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness redeemed, and report the redemption to the board. At the end of each month in which there has been a redemption, a report of the redemption shall be made accompanied by the bonds, notes, or other
 evidences of indebtedness
 that have been taken up and canceled or by a certificate of their destruction by any bank or trust company appointed by the board as fiscal agent or paying agent for those bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness and authorized to destroy bonds, notes, or coupons, or other evidences of indebtedness upon payment of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 11.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)